Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB892.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "braiding" and "cosmetology" in section 1 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, amended October 16, 2024 (P.L.983, No.100), are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Blow-dry styling" means the practice of shampooing, conditioning, drying, arranging, curling, straightening or styling hair using only mechanical devices or topical agents, such as hairsprays, balms, oils or serums. The term:(1) Includes the use and styling of hair extensions, hair pieces or wigs.(2) Excludes cutting hair or the application of dyes, bleach, reactive chemicals, keratin treatments or other preparations to color or alter the structure of hair.(3) Is distinct from the practice of cosmetology.* * *"Braiding" means intertwining the hair in a systematic motion to create patterns in a three-dimensional form, inverting the hair against the scalp along part of a straight or curved row of intertwined hair or twisting the hair in a systematic motion, and includes extending the hair with natural or synthetic hair fibers. The term:(1) Includes the practice of utilizing a technique that results in tension on hair roots of an individual, such as twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking or braiding of the hair.(2) Is distinct from the practice of cosmetology.* * *"Cosmetology" includes [any or all] work done for compensation by any person, which work is generally and usually performed by cosmetologists, which work is for the [embellishment, cleanliness and] beautification of the human hair, such as [arranging, braiding, dressing, curling, waving,] permanent waving, [cleansing,] permanent curling, cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, pressing, or similar work thereon 20250SB0892PN1003 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and thereabout, and the removal of superfluous hair, and the massaging, cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising, or similar work upon the scalp, face, arms or hands, or the upper part of the body, by the use of mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances or cosmetics, preparations, tonics, antiseptics, creams or lotions, or by any other means, and of manicuring the nails, which enumerated practices shall be inclusive of the term cosmetology but not in limitation thereof. The term also includes the acts comprising the practice of nail technology and esthetics.* * *"Eyelash extension" means the application, removal or trimming of threadlike natural or synthetic fibers to the lash line of an individual. The term:(1) Includes the cleaning of lashes.(2) Excludes a color agent, straightening agent, permanent waving solution, bleaching agent or another cosmetology service.(3) Is distinct from the practice of cosmetology and esthetics.* * *"Makeup application" means the application of a temporary cosmetic to enhance the appearance of the face or skin, including powder, foundation, rouge, eyeshadow, eyeliner, mascara or lipstick. The term:(1) Includes the application of makeup applied using an airbrush.(2) Excludes the application of permanent makeup or tattooing.(3) Is distinct from the practice of cosmetology and esthetics.20250SB0892PN1003 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Threading" means removing hair from the eyebrows, upper lip or other body part by using a cotton thread to pull hair from follicles. The term:(1) Includes the use of over-the-counter astringents, gels, powders, tweezers or scissors incidental to threading.(2) Is distinct from the practice of cosmetology and esthetics.Section 2. Section 17 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 17. To Whom Provisions in this Act Shall Not Apply.--* * *(c) An individual engaged solely in the practice of blow-dry styling, eyelash extension, makeup application, braiding or threading is exempt from this act.(d) If a facility where an individual provides a service, or a combination of services, described under subsection (c) and does not provide another service for which a license under this act is required, the facility is exempt from any cosmetology, esthetics or nail technology salon licensing requirement.(e) An individual who is exempt from this act in accordance with subsection (c) may provide a service, or a combination of services, described under subsection (c) in a licensed cosmetology, esthetics or nail technology salon but may not provide another service for which a license under this act is required.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0892PN1003 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627